Wisconsin, session 2025, AB1090.
do enact as follows:AB1090,11Section 1. 16.03 (2) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1090,2,5216.03 (2) (a) Establish and periodically review a statewide policy with the 3purpose of preventing and ending homelessness in this state. The statewide policy 4shall include specific strategies for preventing and ending homelessness among 5older adults in this state.AB1090,26Section 2. 20.835 (2) (fm) of the statutes is created to read:AB1090,2,8720.835 (2) (fm) Senior citizen property tax credit. A sum sufficient to make the 8payments under s. 71.07 (8d).AB1090,39Section 3. 71.07 (8d) of the statutes is created to read:AB1090,2,111071.07 (8d) Senior citizen property tax credit. (a) Definitions. In this 11subsection:AB1090,2,15121. “Claimant” means an individual who has reached age 65 by December 31 of 13the taxable year to which the claim relates or an individual and his or her spouse 14filing a joint return, either of whom has reached age 65 by December 31 of the 15taxable year to which the claim relates, and who files a claim under this subsection.AB1090,3,2162. “Principal dwelling” means a dwelling that is owned and used by the 17claimant as a primary dwelling for the entire taxable year for which the credit 18under this subsection is claimed and the land surrounding it, not exceeding one 19acre, for use of the dwelling as a primary dwelling, including a part of a 1multidwelling or multipurpose building and a part of the land upon which it is built 2that is used as the claimant’s primary dwelling.AB1090,3,1433. “Property taxes” means the property taxes, exclusive of special 4assessments, delinquent interest, and charges for service, paid by a claimant, and 5the claimant’s spouse if filing a joint return, levied on the claimant’s principal 6dwelling in this state less any property taxes levied that are properly included as a 7trade or business expense under section 162 of the Internal Revenue Code. If the 8principal dwelling on which the taxes were paid is owned by 2 or more individuals 9or entities as joint tenants or tenants in common or is owned by spouses as marital 10property, “property taxes” means that part of the property taxes paid that reflects 11the ownership percentage of the claimant, plus the ownership percentage of the 12claimant’s spouse for spouses who file a joint return. “Property taxes” includes 13monthly municipal permit fees with respect to a principal dwelling imposed under 14s. 66.0435 (3) (c).AB1090,4,215(b) Filing claims. For taxable years beginning after December 31, 2025, and 16subject to the limitations provided in this subsection, a claimant may claim as a 17credit against the tax imposed under s. 71.02, an amount equal to the amount of the 18property taxes the claimant paid in the taxable year on the claimant’s principal 19dwelling in excess of the amount of the property taxes the claimant paid in the 20immediately preceding taxable year on the claimant’s principal dwelling. If the 21allowable amount of the claim exceeds the income taxes otherwise due on the 22claimant’s income, the amount of the claim not used as an offset against those taxes 23shall be certified by the department of revenue to the department of administration 1for payment to the claimant by check, share draft, or other draft from the 2appropriation under s. 20.835 (2) (fm).AB1090,4,53(c) Limitations. 1. a. No credit may be allowed under this subsection if the 4claimant or the claimant’s spouse files a claim under sub. (6e) that relates to the 5same taxable year for which a claim is made under this subsection.AB1090,4,86b. No credit may be allowed under this subsection for an amount of property 7taxes claimed as a credit under sub. (9) or subch. VIII, or both, that relates to the 8same taxable year for which a claim is made under this subsection.AB1090,4,119c. No credit may be allowed under this subsection for an amount of property 10taxes claimed as a credit under subch. IX that relates to the same taxable year for 11which a claim is made under this subsection.AB1090,4,13122. Except as provided in subd. 4., only one claimant per household per taxable 13year may claim a credit under this subsection.AB1090,4,15143. No credit may be allowed under this subsection for property taxes that the 15claimant pays on his or her principal dwelling that is leased to the claimant.AB1090,4,18164. If married persons who are eligible to claim the credit under this subsection 17file separate returns, each spouse may claim a credit under this subsection on the 18basis of his or her respective ownership interest in the principal dwelling.AB1090,4,20195. No credit may be allowed under this subsection unless it is claimed within 20the time period under s. 71.75 (2).AB1090,4,22216. Part-year residents and nonresidents of this state are not eligible for the 22credit under this subsection.AB1090,5,223(d) Administration. 1. In administering this subsection, the department of 24revenue shall make available suitable forms with instructions for claimants, 1including a form that may be included with, or as a part of, the individual income 2tax form.AB1090,5,432. Subsection (9e) (d), to the extent that it applies to the credit under that 4subsection, applies to the credit under this subsection.AB1090,45Section 4. 71.10 (4) (i) of the statutes, as affected by 2025 Wisconsin Act 15, 6is amended to read:AB1090,5,16771.10 (4) (i) The total of claim of right credit under s. 71.07 (1), farmland 8preservation credit under ss. 71.57 to 71.61, farmland preservation credit, 2010 and 9beyond under s. 71.613, homestead credit under subch. VIII, jobs tax credit under s. 1071.07 (3q), business development credit under s. 71.07 (3y), research credit under s. 1171.07 (4k) (e) 2. a., film production services credit under s. 71.07 (5f) (b) 2., veterans 12and surviving spouses property tax credit under s. 71.07 (6e), senior citizen 13property tax credit under s. 71.07 (8d), enterprise zone jobs credit under s. 71.07 14(3w), electronics and information technology manufacturing zone credit under s. 1571.07 (3wm), earned income tax credit under s. 71.07 (9e), estimated tax payments 16under s. 71.09, and taxes withheld under subch. X.AB1090,5,1717